Nevada, session 83, AB316.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 386 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of county commissioners of each county in this
State shall appoint to the board of trustees of the county school
district one nonvoting pupil trustee nominated from the pupils in
the county school district in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 3.
2. The pupil trustee appointed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Reside in the county;
(b) Be enrolled in grade 11 or 12 as a full-time pupil of a
public high school in the county; and
(c) Be nominated in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 3.
3. To be nominated for appointment to the board of trustees:
(a) In a county school district where less than 50,000 pupils
are enrolled for the current school year, the pupil trustee must be
nominated by a majority vote of the pupils enrolled in the public
middle schools, junior high schools and high schools in the county
school district in a vote conducted in accordance with the policies
and regulations of the board of trustees of the county school
district.
(b) In a county school district where 50,000 or more pupils are
enrolled for the current school year:
(1) The pupils enrolled in the public middle schools, junior
high schools and high schools in each election district within the
county school district shall, by majority vote, nominate two pupils
to represent the schools at a convention;
(2) The pupils nominated pursuant to subparagraph (1)
shall, by majority vote, nominate two candidates from amongst
themselves to be presented to the pupils enrolled in the public
middle schools, junior high schools and high schools in the county
school district; and
(3) The pupils enrolled in the middle schools, junior high
schools and high schools in the county school district shall, by
majority vote, nominate from amongst those pupils presented
pursuant to subparagraph (2) the pupil to serve as pupil trustee on
the board of trustees.
-
*AB316*

– 3 –
4. The term of a pupil trustee appointed to the board of
trustees pursuant to subsection 1 is 1 year.
5. The pupil trustee appointed pursuant to subsection 1 shall
have:
(a) The same rights as voting members of the board of trustees,
including, without limitation, attending all meetings, being
involved in any briefings, evaluations, closed-door sessions and
policy and operational discussions and receiving all meeting
materials provided to the voting trustees;
(b) The right to receive training for professional development
that is equivalent to the training provided to the other trustees
pursuant to NRS 386.327; and
(c) The right to express an opinion before any vote taken by
the board of trustees.
6. The pupil trustee appointed pursuant to subsection 1
represents all pupils within the county school district and shall:
(a) Serve as a liaison between the pupils in the county school
district and the voting members of the board of trustees;
(b) Keep pupils within the county school district informed of
the business of the board of trustees;
(c) Introduce and speak on matters that impact pupils within
the county school district, as appropriate; and
(d) Attend not less than 75 percent of the meetings of the board
of trustees.
Sec. 2. NRS 386.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.120 1. The board of trustees of a county school district
consists of [5, 7] 6, 8 or [11] 12 members as follows:
(a) If more than 75,000 pupils were enrolled during the school
year next preceding any general election, the board of trustees
consists of [11] 12 members. The members of the board must be
elected and appointed as provided in NRS 386.165.
(b) If 1,000 or more but not more than 75,000 pupils were
enrolled during the school year next preceding any general election,
the board of trustees consists of [seven] eight members. Except in
school districts in which more than 25,000 pupils are enrolled, the
voting members of the board must be elected at large until such time
as an alternate manner of election is adopted pursuant to NRS
386.200 or NRS 386.205, 386.215 and 386.225.
(c) If fewer than 1,000 pupils were enrolled during the school
year next preceding any general election, the board of trustees
consists of [five] six members. The voting members of the board
must be elected as provided in NRS 386.160 until such time as an
alternate manner of election is adopted pursuant to NRS 386.200 or
NRS 386.205, 386.215 and 386.225.
-
*AB316*

– 4 –
(d) If 1,000 or more, but fewer than 1,500 pupils were enrolled
during the school year next preceding any general election, the
board of trustees consists of [seven] eight members unless the
board, on or before December 1 in any year before a general
election will be held, adopts a resolution specifying that the board
will consist of [five] six members. If the board consists of [seven]
eight members, the election of voting members is governed by
paragraph (b). If the board consists of [five] six members, the
election of voting members is governed by paragraph (c).
2. Before the adoption of a resolution pursuant to paragraph (d)
of subsection 1, the board of trustees shall post conspicuously, in
three different places in the school district, a notice containing in
full the text of the resolution with the date upon which the board of
trustees of the school district is to meet to act upon the resolution.
Posting of the notice must be made not less than 10 days before the
date fixed in the resolution for action thereon.
3. If a board of trustees adopts a resolution pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1, it must transmit a copy of the
resolution to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on or before
December 15 of the year before the general election will be held.
Sec. 3. NRS 386.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.160 1. At the general election in 1980 and every 4 years
thereafter, in a county school district where fewer than 1,000 pupils
were enrolled during the preceding school year, three trustees shall
be elected at large within the district, as follows:
(a) One person who resides at the county seat; but if less than 40
percent of the residents of the county reside at the county seat then
such person need not reside at the county seat.
(b) One person who resides in the county but not at the county
seat.
(c) One person who resides in the county but not at the county
seat; but if 80 percent or more of the residents of the county reside
at the county seat then a person who resides at the county seat may
be elected to the office.
2. At the general election in 1982 and every 4 years thereafter,
in a county school district where fewer than 1,000 pupils were
enrolled during the preceding school year, two trustees shall be
elected at large within the district, as follows:
(a) One person who resides at the county seat; but if less than 20
percent of the residents of the county reside at the county seat then
such person need not reside at the county seat.
(b) One person who resides in the county but who resides
neither at the county seat nor in any incorporated city within the
county.
-
*AB316*

– 5 –
3. One nonvoting pupil trustee must be appointed by the
board of county commissioners pursuant to section 1 of this act.
The term of each person elected to the office of school trustee is 4
years.
Sec. 4. NRS 386.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.165 1. In each county school district in which more than
75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees shall establish seven
election districts for school trustees. The districts must be:
(a) As nearly equal in population as practicable; and
(b) Composed of contiguous territory.
2. The board of trustees in each county school district in which
more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled is composed of [11] 12
members, of whom:
(a) Seven voting members must be elected in election districts
established pursuant to subsection 1 by the board of trustees.
(b) One nonvoting member must be appointed by the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the school district is
located. The member appointed pursuant to this paragraph must
reside in the county in which the school district is located.
(c) Three nonvoting members must be appointed by the
governing bodies of the three most populous incorporated cities in
the county in which the school district is located, with each
governing body appointing one member. Each member appointed
pursuant to this paragraph must reside in the city in which the
governing body is required to make the appointment.
(d) One nonvoting pupil trustee must be appointed by the
board of county commissioners pursuant to section 1 of this act.
3. In each county school district in which more than 25,000
pupils but not more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of
trustees shall establish seven election districts for school trustees, as
follows:
(a) Five districts which are as nearly equal in population as
practicable, each of which includes approximately one-fifth of the
population of the county; and
(b) Two districts which are as nearly equal in population as
practicable, each of which includes approximately one-half of the
population of the county.
 The districts must be composed of contiguous territory.
4. Each elected trustee of a school district to which this section
applies must reside in the election district which the trustee
represents and be elected by the voters of that election district.
5. In each school district in which more than 25,000 pupils but
not more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees is
composed of [seven] eight members [who] , of whom:
-
*AB316*

– 6 –
(a) Seven members must be elected in an election district
established pursuant to subsection 3 by the board of trustees [.] ;
and
(b) One nonvoting member must be appointed by the board of
county commissioners pursuant to section 1 of this act.
6. The appointing authority shall make an appointment
pursuant to subsection 2 at least 30 days but not more than 90 days
before the expiration of the term of office of the incumbent member.
7. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
the term of office of a school trustee is 4 years, commencing on the
first Monday of January thereafter next following the election of the
trustee.
8. Each trustee shall hold office until his or her successor is
appointed or elected and qualified.
9. The nonvoting members of the board of trustees appointed
pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), shall have the
same rights and responsibilities as voting members of the board of
trustees, including, without limitation, being involved in any
briefings, interviews, evaluations, closed-door sessions and policy
and operational discussions; and
(b) Do not have voting rights for the election of officers or the
authority to serve as an officer of the board of trustees.
Sec. 5. NRS 386.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.180 1. If the certificate of the Superintendent of Public
Instruction filed with the county clerk states that the pupil
enrollment during the preceding school year in a county school
district other than Clark or Washoe was less than 1,000, or was
1,000 or more but less than 1,500 in a district in which the board of
trustees has adopted a resolution in accordance with NRS 386.120
specifying that the board will consist of [five] six members, and the
board of trustees of the district is composed of [seven] eight
members , seven of whom were elected at large based upon a
previous pupil enrollment of 1,000 or more, then two of the elected
offices of trustee may not be filled at the next succeeding general
election.
2. Thereafter, while continued pupil enrollment in the county
school district is less than 1,000, or is 1,000 or more but less than
1,500 in a district in which the board of trustees has adopted a
resolution in accordance with NRS 386.120 specifying that the
board will consist of [five] six members, the offices of school
trustees must be filled as provided by law for school districts having
pupil enrollments of less than 1,000.
-
*AB316*

– 7 –
Sec. 6. NRS 386.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.190 1. If the certificate of the Superintendent of Public
Instruction filed with the county clerk states that the pupil
enrollment during the preceding school year in a county school
district was 1,000 or more, and the board of trustees of the district is
composed of [five] six members elected and appointed as provided
in NRS 386.160, then at the next succeeding general election one
additional trustee who resides at the county seat must be elected for
a term of 4 years, and one additional trustee who resides in the
county but not at the county seat must be elected for a term of 2
years.
2. Thereafter, while continued pupil enrollment in the county
school district is 1,000 or more, the offices of school trustees must
be filled as provided by law for school districts having pupil
enrollments of that size.
3. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 do not apply in a
school district in which the pupil enrollment during the preceding
school year was 1,000 or more but less than 1,500, and in which the
board of trustees of the school district has adopted a resolution
specifying that the board will consist of [five] six members.
Sec. 7. NRS 386.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.200 1. In addition to the manner of election provided in
NRS 386.205, 386.215 and 386.225, the trustees of a county school
district may be elected from school trustee election areas in the
alternate manner provided in this section.
2. Within 30 days before May 1 of any year in which a general
election is to be held in the State, 10 percent or more of the
registered voters of a county school district in which 25,000 or
fewer pupils are enrolled may file a written petition with the board
of county commissioners of the county praying for the creation of
school trustee election areas within the county school district in the
manner provided in this section. The petition must specify with
particularity the school trustee election areas proposed to be created,
the number of trustees to be elected from each area, and the manner
of their nomination and election. The number of school trustee
election areas proposed must not exceed the number of elected
trustees authorized by law for the particular county school district.
The description of the proposed school trustee election areas need
not be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but must
be sufficient to enable a person to ascertain what territory is
proposed to be included within a particular school trustee election
area. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one
paper, but each signer must add to his or her name his or her place
of residence, giving the street and number whenever practicable.
One of the signers of each paper shall swear or affirm, before a
-
*AB316*

– 8 –
person competent to administer oaths, that each signature to the
paper appended is the genuine signature of the person whose name it
purports to be.
3. Immediately after the receipt of the petition, the board of
county commissioners shall fix a date for a public hearing to be held
during the month of May, and shall give notice thereof by
publication at least once in a newspaper published in the county, or
if no such newspaper is published therein then in a newspaper
published in the State of Nevada and having a general circulation in
the county. The costs of publication of the notice is a proper charge
against the county school district fund.
4. If, as a result of the public hearing, the board of county
commissioners finds that the creation of school trustee election areas
within the county school district is desirable, the board of county
commissioners shall, by resolution regularly adopted before June 1,
divide the county school district into the number of school trustee
election areas specified in the petition, designate them by number
and define their boundaries. The territory comprising each school
trustee election area must be contiguous. The resolution must further
set forth the number of trustees to be elected from each school
trustee election area and the manner of their nomination and
election.
5. Before June 1 and immediately following the adoption of the
resolution creating school trustee election areas within a county
school district, the clerk of the board of county commissioners shall
transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the Superintendent of
Public Instruction.
6. Upon the creation of school trustee election areas within a
county school district the terms of office of all elected trustees then
in office expire on the 1st Monday of January thereafter next
following a general election. At the general election held following
the creation of school trustee election areas within a county school
district, school trustees to represent the odd-numbered school trustee
election areas must be elected for terms of 4 years and school
trustees to represent the even-numbered school trustee election areas
must be elected for terms of 2 years. Thereafter, at each general
election, the offices of elected school trustees must be filled for
terms of 4 years in the order in which the terms of office expire.
7. A candidate for the office of trustee of a county school
district in which school trustee election areas have been created
must be a qualified elector and a resident of the school trustee
election area which he or she seeks to represent.
8. The board of county commissioners may by resolution
change the boundaries of school trustee election areas or the manner
of nomination or election of school trustees after:
-
*AB316*

– 9 –
(a) Holding a public hearing of which notice must be given as
provided in subsection 3; and
(b) Receiving, at the hearing or by resolution, the consent of the
board of trustees of the school district.
9. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies to the
county clerk that the enrollment of pupils during the preceding
school year in a county school district was less than 1,000, or was
1,000 or more but less than 1,500 in a district in which the board of
trustees has adopted a resolution in accordance with NRS 386.120
specifying that the board will consist of [five] six members, and the
board of trustees of the county school district is composed of eight
members, seven of whom were elected [members] based upon a
previous enrollment of 1,000 or more, the board of county
commissioners shall alter the school trustee election areas or change
the number of trustees to be elected from the areas, or the manner of
their nomination and election, as may be necessary to provide for
reduction of the membership of the board of trustees of the county
school board from [seven] eight to [five] six members, and only five
school trustees may thereafter be nominated and elected at the
forthcoming elections.
10. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies to the
county clerk that the enrollment of pupils during the preceding
school year in a county school district was 1,000 or more, and the
board of trustees of the county school district is composed of six
members, five of whom were elected , [members,] the board of
county commissioners shall alter the school trustee election areas or
change the number of trustees to be elected from the areas, or the
manner of their nomination and election, as may be necessary to
provide for increasing the membership of the board of trustees of the
county school district from [five] six to [seven] eight members, and
two additional school trustees must thereafter be nominated and
elected at the forthcoming elections.
11. The provisions of subsection 10 do not apply in a school
district in which the pupil enrollment during the preceding school
year was 1,000 or more but less than 1,500, and in which the board
of trustees of the school district has adopted a resolution specifying
that the board will consist of [five] six members.
Sec. 8. NRS 386.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.205 1. In any county school district in which not more
than 25,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees may adopt a
resolution dividing the geographical area of the school district into a
number of election districts identical to the number of elected
trustees.
2. The election districts must:
(a) Be single-member districts.
-
*AB316*

– 10 –
(b) Be formed with reference to assembly districts as far as is
practicable.
(c) Have nearly equal populations as far as is practicable.
3. This section does not authorize any change in the number of
members of the board of trustees.
4. If a board of trustees adopts a resolution pursuant to this
section, the elected members of the board continue to hold office
until the next following general election.
5. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “assembly district” means any district created pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 218B of NRS for the election of members
of the Assembly.
Sec. 9. NRS 386.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.225 1. Election districts created pursuant to NRS
386.205 may be constructed so that the:
(a) Voters in each election district elect a trustee to represent
them; or
(b) Trustees are elected by all of the voters in the county school
district.
 In either case, each trustee must be a resident of the election
district which he or she represents throughout his or her term of
office.
2. The board of trustees shall adopt a resolution, after a public
hearing on the matter, determining whether each elected trustee will
be elected solely by the voters in the election district of the trustee
or all of the voters in the county school district.
Sec. 10. NRS 386.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.270 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 386.275:
1. Any vacancy occurring among the elected members of a
board of trustees must be filled by appointment by the remaining
elected members of the board at a public meeting held after notice
of the meeting is published at least once each week for 2 weeks in a
newspaper qualified pursuant to the provisions of chapter 238 of
NRS. The appointee shall serve until the next general election, at
which time his or her successor must be elected for the balance of
the unexpired term.
2. Any vacancy occurring among the appointed members of a
board of trustees must be filled by the appointing authority. The
appointee serves for the balance of the unexpired term and may be
reappointed.
3. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy must have the
qualifications provided in NRS 386.165 , [or] 386.240, or section 1
of this act, as applicable.
-
*AB316*

– 11 –
Sec. 11. NRS 386.327 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.327 1. [Each] Except as otherwise provided in section 1
of this act, each person who is elected or appointed to serve as a
member of the board of trustees of a school district shall complete
training for professional development during the first and third year
of the term of the member which must include not less than 6 hours
of instruction covering:
(a) Laws relating to public records, including, without
limitation, the provisions of chapter 239 of NRS;
(b) The Open Meeting Law, including, without limitation, the
provisions of chapter 241 of NRS;
(c) Local government employee-management relations,
including, without limitation, the provisions of chapter 288 of NRS;
(d) The system of K-12 public education in this State, including,
without limitation, the provisions of title 34 of NRS;
(e) Local government ethics, including, without limitation, the
provisions of chapter 281A of NRS;
(f) The manner in which to identify and prevent violence in
public schools, including, without limitation, sexual violence;
(g) Financial management, including, without limitation,
information concerning oversight, accountability and audits;
(h) The fiduciary duties of a member of the board of trustees of
a school district, including, without limitation, the provisions of this
chapter; and
(i) Laws relating to employment and contracts.
2. A member of the board of trustees of a school district shall
provide written certification of completion of the training required
by this section to the clerk of the board of trustees.
3. If a member fails to complete the training or to provide the
written certification of completion which is required by this section,
the clerk must post notice of such noncompliance in a conspicuous
manner on the Internet website of the board of trustees. The clerk
must also provide written notice of the noncompliance to the other
members of the board of trustees.
4. The clerk of the board of trustees shall assist each member
of the board as necessary to complete the training required pursuant
to this section.
H
-
*AB316*